Once upon a time, in a land veiled by the threads of harmony and melody, a unique town called Notenberg nestled between two grand mountain ranges. Notenberg was no ordinary town; it was a sanctuary for musicians. The sound of the piano echoed from the hills in the morning, the violin whispered lullabies at night, and the daytime was filled with symphonies of other instruments, both familiar and exotic. Notenberg was alive with the language of music, shaping the rhythms of daily life.

In Notenberg, there lived an elderly composer, Maestro Silvio, famed for his profound symphonies and musical talent. He had lived his entire life crafting pieces that brought tears to the sternest eyes and could make the happiest souls reflective. But there was one symphony he had always dreamed of completing – 'The Symphony of the Mountains', an opus that would encapsulate the grandeur and mysticism of the mountains surrounding Notenberg.

Years went by, and Maestro Silvio aged. Despite his best efforts, the symphony remained elusive. The notes he penned down failed to capture the grandeur of the mountains, their stories whispered by the winds, and the melodies sung by the streams. Frustration welled up within the Maestro; he was afraid that his life's work would remain incomplete.

One day, a young girl named Melody moved to Notenberg. Her family were weavers, not musicians, but Melody had an inexplicable affinity for music. She wasn't trained, but she could feel music in her very bones – in the rustling leaves, in the trickle of the stream, in the very air she breathed. The town quickly took notice of the little girl who danced to the rhythm of the wind and hummed along with the birds.

Melody soon learned about Maestro Silvio's lifelong quest and his growing despair. One day, she gathered her courage and visited the Maestro. With a smile, she told him, "The mountains don't sing in notes, Maestro. They sing in colors, in feelings, in memories. You've been trying to capture a picture with sound, but you've forgotten the essence of it."

Maestro Silvio, taken aback by her words, invited Melody to help him understand. Over the next few days, Melody guided Silvio through the town, helping him experience the mountains not as a composer but as a listener. They listened to the whispers of the wind, the tales told by the rustling leaves, and the songs of the birds returning to their nests. For the first time in years, Maestro Silvio felt the mountains' symphony, not with his mind, but with his soul.

With Melody's insight and his renewed perspective, Maestro Silvio composed like never before. The town of Notenberg was filled with an enchanting melody, richer and more profound than any of the Maestro's previous compositions. It was as though the mountains themselves were playing in a grand orchestra.

On completion, 'The Symphony of the Mountains' was performed at the heart of Notenberg. As the music echoed through the valleys, the audience was moved to tears, for they could hear the mountains singing, they could hear their heartbeats in the rhythm, and in that magical moment, they were one with the mountains.

The Maestro, with gratitude in his heart, looked at Melody. The young girl, with wisdom far beyond her years, had helped him realize his dream. She had shown him that music was not just about perfect notes and rhythms, but about feelings, experiences, and the innate connections between all things.

From that day forward, Notenberg was no longer just a town of musicians, but a place where one could listen to the symphony of life itself, resonating with the rhythm of the universe. As for Maestro Silvio, he found his masterpiece, and Melody found her place in the world of music - not as a weaver, but as a weaver of sounds, rhythms, and emotions. Their bond transcended that of a teacher and a student, embodying the true spirit of music - connection, harmony, and timeless resonance.

In a quaint, quiet town named Narratoria, there was an ancient library known as the Scriber's Haven. It was said to contain the world's knowledge and secrets in the countless books it housed. However, what made Scriber's Haven truly special was a legend that circulated amongst the townsfolk: it was said that at midnight, the library would come alive.

Esme, a twelve-year-old girl who loved books more than anything else, was fascinated by this legend. She was raised by her grandmother, who often recited tales of the enchanted library, sparking Esme's curiosity. Her heart yearned to uncover the truth behind the stories.

One moonlit night, cloaked in the silence of curiosity and anticipation, Esme sneaked into Scriber's Haven. As the clock struck midnight, she held her breath, waiting for something magical to happen. The seconds ticked by and as the final stroke of midnight chimed, the library began to shimmer, resonating with an ethereal glow.

In a flash of golden light, books flew off the shelves, opening their pages to reveal swirling galaxies of words. Characters from the books materialized around her, creating a universe where fact met fiction, and the ordinary met the extraordinary. The enchanted library had come alive!

Esme was awestruck. She met pirates from adventurous tales, conversed with characters from history books, and even debated riddles with creatures from fantasy novels. It was like every book lover's dream come true. However, she noticed that as each hour passed, the characters started to fade slowly, their energy waning.

By dawn, the library began to settle back into its usual, quiet self. The characters started returning to their respective books, their forms transforming back into words on the pages. But Esme noticed a little paper dragon, Gasper, from her favorite fantasy novel, struggling to get back into his book. He was weak and could barely fly.

Esme, with a heart full of compassion, approached Gasper. "How can I help you?" she asked. Gasper explained that the characters could only remain strong if their stories were read and loved by people. Lately, fewer people were visiting the library, preferring technology over books. Their stories were being forgotten, causing them to lose their energy.

Moved by Gasper's plight, Esme made it her mission to revive the love of books in Narratoria. She started a campaign, sharing her experiences and the importance of keeping stories alive. She initiated reading clubs, story-telling sessions, and even managed to integrate technology with traditional reading habits.

Gradually, the townsfolk rekindled their interest in reading. Children and adults alike began visiting Scriber's Haven, diving into the world of stories. As more people read, the characters in the enchanted library grew stronger. Gasper, the little paper dragon, regained his vigor, flying around with renewed energy.

Esme's love for books saved the enchanted library, proving the power of stories and imagination. She continued to visit the library every midnight, immersing herself in the magic of the living stories and ensuring they remained loved and cherished. From that day forward, Esme was not just a book lover; she became the guardian of Scriber's Haven, the protector of the magical world within words.

This is an appeal against summary judgment under CPR Part 24 for some £1,890,000 under two contracts of guarantee. The guarantees had been given in the name of ZAO Atalantribflot, but the defendant against whom judgment has been given and who appeals to this court with the leave of Longmore LJ is OAO Atlantrybflot. Both are separate Russian companies. Nothing turns on the difference between "Atalantribflot" and "Atlantrybflot" which are both transliterations from the cyrillic Russian script. However, whereas "ZAO" apparently carries the meaning that "Ltd" does in English law, "OAO" is the equivalent of "plc". A more literal translation of the Russian words for which the initials stand are "closed joint stock company" and "open joint stock company" respectively. I will refer to the two companies as ZAO and OAO. At the time the guarantees were entered into ZAO was a subsidiary of OAO, but since then and prior to the bringing of these proceedings OAO has been sold to third parties.
The judge, HHJ Chambers QC, sitting as a judge of the Queen's Bench Division, held that the guarantees were ambiguous because they referred to ZAO's "registered office" as being at "19 K Marks [sic] Street, 236000, Kaliningrad, Russia". That, however, was the registered office of OAO, whereas the judge pointed out that ZAO's registered office was in Moscow and that it had no registered address in Kaliningrad. On the basis of that irregularity and the ambiguity to which it was said to give rise, the judge considered extrinsic documentary evidence which convinced him that the true identity of the guarantor was not ZAO but OAO. He did not think that it was a proper case of misnomer, although that has been the claimant creditor's primary submission as respondent to this appeal, but he added that the same result could be obtained by applying the misnomer test. He did not therefore have to consider an allegation of estoppel by convention which the claimant had also relied upon. He did not place any store on an argument raised by OAO that in any event the claimant had assigned its cause of action to a third party. In short, he found summarily for the claimant as a matter of the construction of the guarantees in the light of extrinsic evidence.
The claimant, and respondent to this appeal, is Dumford Trading AG ("Dumford"), a company incorporated in Liechtenstein. Dumford lent $2.1 million to Shelley Marketing LLC ("Shelley"), a Delaware company, to purchase a fishing vessel. Shelley's indebtedness to Dumford was guaranteed by ZAO. Both the initial loan agreement and the initial guarantee were dated 22 November 2001. Subsequently further advances were made to Shelley and a new agreement was made dated 5 November 2002, described as an "Amendment and Restatement Agreement" incorporating amendments to the original loan agreement and guarantee (the "Amendment Agreement"). Dumford claims in these proceedings under both the original and amended guarantees. An amended and restated form of the original loan agreement, containing the agreed amendments, was drawn up and scheduled as Schedule 1 to the Amendment Agreement. The title page of the amended loan agreement stated "DATED 22 November 2001 as amended and restated on 5 November 2002". It is not clear if it was separately executed, but that hardly seems to matter.
The two guarantees contain English jurisdiction and English law clauses. OAO was served in England on the basis of the service of suit provision contained in them. OAO disputes that it is a party to these guarantees and therefore has also disputed English jurisdiction. Dumford applied for summary judgment. Both parties' applications, OAO's to set aside service and Dumford's for summary judgment, were heard together, and the upshot was judgment on the claim.
The assignment issue

It is convenient to take the assignment issue first, for it stands separately from the other issues and raises a preliminary defence relating to "title to sue". It arises as follows. Dumford wished to arrest fishing vessels over which security had been given to Dumford under the loan agreements. The plan was to arrest the vessels in Mauritania. Dumford appears to have received advice from its Mauritanian lawyer, Maitre Toure, that if Dumford arrested the vessels it would have to provide a substantial counter-guarantee, but that would not be necessary if the arrest was performed by a Mauritanian company. On 2 December 2003 a deed of assignment was therefore executed between Dumford and a Mauritanian company known as Mauribalt SA under which Dumford assigned to Mauribalt all its rights, title and interest in the loan agreements and guarantees. A copy of the assignment is before the court. Nothing is said as to its proper law, but, since the document also purported to effect a complete novation of the relevant contracts from Dumford to Mauribalt, it may be that its proper law was English law. It is signed as having been made in Vaduz. Pursuant to an order of the Mauritanian court made on 8 December 2003 the Mousson was arrested on 11 December in the Mauritanian port of Nouadhibou, inferentially by Mauribalt SA, but this may be in dispute. The Mousson was subsequently sold by public auction on 23 February 2004 for US$625,000. The assignment appears to have come into the possession of OAO, by whom it was disclosed in these proceedings: this may entitle OAO to say that notice of the assignment was served on them. It is not clear whether the assignment was served on the vessel as part of the Mauritanian proceedings or otherwise sent to OAO. Evidence tendered on behalf of Dumford (see Professor Lugovtsov's third witness statement at paras 78/85) gives an explanation of these events. It includes a statement (at para 85) that the Mousson's arrest was effected on the basis of the assignment. OAO has therefore taken the point that a legal assignment has been effected as a result of which Dumford has lost its title to sue on the contracts of loan or the guarantees.
The forensic chronology of this issue is of relevance to a claim for summary judgment. On 1 March 2004 OAO's solicitors, Messrs Baker & McKenzie, enquired whether any assignment had taken place. On 3 March 2004 Dumford's solicitors, Messrs Nabarro Nathanson, replied to say that the question was irrelevant but that they were instructed that there had been no assignment. On 8 March the assignment was exhibited to an affidavit made on behalf of OAO by Mr Gerald Cooke, a partner of Baker & McKenzie: the affidavit went on to say that OAO was investigating the sale of the Mousson at public auction in Mauretania in February 2004. On 11 March 2004 Mauribalt sent a fax dated 10 March to Dumford saying it was "pleased to confirm" that as a result of clause 16.3 of the loan agreements "the purported assignment was of no effect".
Clause 16.3 states –
"16. ASSIGNMENT AND PARTICIPATION
16.1 This assignment shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Lender and the Borrower and its respective successors and assigns.
16.2 The Borrower may not assign its rights or obligations without the prior written consent of the Lender.
16.3 The lender may at any time assign transfer or offer participations in all or a proportion of all its rights and obligations hereunder to any other bank or financial institution and for this purpose:
16.3.1 the Lender shall be at liberty to disclose on a confidential basis to any other bank or financial institution which has taken or may take such an assignment transfer or participation all such information concerning any of the Security Parties, the Ships and the Subject Documents as the Lender deems appropriate; and
16.3.2 the Borrower shall upon demand by and at the expense of the Lender execute all such documents and do all such things as may be necessary to give effect to any such assignment transfer or participation."
Mauribalt's fax also stated that it was not a bank or financial institution.

On 15 March 2004 Professor Lugovtsov made his third witness statement in which he stated that the Mousson's arrest had been effected on the basis of the assignment (and a power of attorney referred to below). He also produced Mauribalt's fax and said that "I now understand that the purported assignment was ineffective."
That may have raised the question how in that case the arrest and sale of the Mousson could have been validly effected. At any rate on 24 March 2004 Maitre Toure made a statement. He explained that as well as the assignment he had a power of attorney from Dumford (also in the papers before the court) and that he had used this in effecting the arrest. He also said, in this respect contradicting Professor Lugovstov, that the assignment "has not been used during arrest and sale of MV Mousson". He concluded:
"I confirm that I informed the Regional Court of Nouadhibou of the position in order to ensure that they were fully aware that the purported assignment was ineffective in English law. The Court have confirmed that, as there is no dispute that the loan was in default and that Dumford Trading AG was entitle to realize the mortgage, and the Court is happy that there has been no adverse or inequitable consequences as a result of the purported assignment being ineffective, the arrest and order for sale of the vessel remains valid."
All that the judge said about this issue was as follows:
"35. During the hearing there was a small debate as to whether or not OAO was maintaining an assertion that Dumford had assigned its cause of action. By the end of the exchange it did not appear that this allegation was being pursued. However, for the avoidance of doubt, I hold that any cause of action in respect of the two guarantees is vested in Dumford."
It is now clear that the point is being maintained by OAO. There is no suggestion by Dumford that it is not open to OAO. What Mr Phillip Marshall QC submits on behalf of Dumford is that clause 16.3 prohibits assignment other than to a bank or financial institution or other than solely on the terms set out in clause 16.3.1/2, and that any assignment is therefore void and ineffective.
It seems to me that if clause 16.3 does prohibit assignment other than to a bank or financial institution, it can only do so implicitly: for clause 16.1 says that the loan agreement shall be binding on Dumford's assigns. Moreover the guarantee merely says by its clause 9.1 that it "shall be enforceable by the successors and permitted assigns of the Lender". But even if the assignment were prohibited by the loan agreement, it is not clear to me that the effect of a breach of that prohibition would be to render the assignment totally ineffective and void at the instance of the assigning party, even though it would clearly be a breach of contract. Thus, the fact that a prohibited assignment might be invalid against a debtor (see Linden Gardens Trust Ltd v Lenesta Sludge Disposals Ltd [1994] 1 AC 85) does not necessarily mean that the assignor retains title to sue, at any rate where the assignment has been acted upon by the assignee. See in general the discussion in CHITTY on Contracts, 29th ed, 2004, Vol I, at paras 19-043/5. The assignment could I suppose be reversed, if that were necessary. For present purposes, however, where the matter has simply been dealt with as a matter of mere assertion without any reference to underlying authorities, issues or analysis, I am unable to conclude that there is no real issue over Dumford's title to sue, and for this if for no other reason it seems to me that OAO should be entitled to defend Dumford's claim.
ZAO and OAO

I revert to the more complex issues relating to the identification of the true party to the guarantees.
The original loan agreement between Dumford and Shelley made reference to the guarantee which "in form and substance satisfactory to" Dumford was to be provided by Shelley as part of the security for the loan (clause 12.1 and 12.1.4). The "Guarantors" were defined (in clause 1.2) as including "ZAO Atalantribflot…a company incorporated under the laws of Russia with its office at Kaliningrad, Russia". Clause 3 ("Availability") specified, by reference to Schedule A, the documents which had to have been received by Dumford as conditions precedent to the advance of the two tranches of the loan. Schedule A similarly referred repeatedly to ZAO (not to OAO): for instance to a certified copy of ZAO's certification of incorporation and memorandum of articles of association. Any notices under the loan agreement were to be sent to Shelley at 19 K Marks Street, Kaliningrad.
The guarantee, which was entered into on the same day, was made between Dumford and ZAO. In introducing ZAO as a party, the guarantee continued: "whose registered office is at 19 K. Marks Str., 236000, Kaliningrad, Russia" (the "Guarantor")", which the judge regarded as significant. The notices clause, clause 12, also said that any demand or notice should be sent to ZAO at that address. The guarantee was executed in the following way. The document ended: SIGNED SEALED AND DELIVERED AS A DEED by ZAO ATALANTRIBFLOT acting by its duly authorised attorney". The signature is that of Mr Gurshchenkov (there are various spellings of his name). He was apparently the chairman of OAO, but not a director or officer of ZAO.
A year later, the Amendment Agreement was expressed to be an agreement made between Dumford as lender, Shelley as borrower and ZAO as guarantor. ZAO's registered office was again given as 19 K Marks Street, Kaliningrad. Clause 5 was a condition precedent clause, requiring documents to be provided as conditions precedent, but this time not to draw-down but to the agreement as a whole. Among the documents required by that clause was a certificate of ZAO that there had been no changes as regards any of the documents delivered pursuant to Schedule A of the original loan agreement. The execution for ZAO was in identical form as in the case of the original guarantee. One of the clause 5 documents was "evidence of the due authority of any person signing this Agreement on behalf of…each Guarantor". Documents evidencing Mr Gurshchenkov's authority to sign which formed part of the "bible" on execution were minutes of OAO's board of directors and shareholders and a power of attorney signed by a director and the secretary of OAO, each dated 29 October 2002. What, however, marks out the documents in question as being the documents of OAO rather than ZAO on their face is the use of OAO's seal.
The judge said:
"22. In the present case, ZAO has no registered address in Kaliningrad which is a Baltic port. I think that raises enough uncertainty to require resort to external evidence for its resolution. But the matter goes further, because the address that appears in the guarantees is that of ZAO's parent company, OAO. The confusion is patent and there is nothing in the guarantees that resolves it. I find it clear on the evidence before me that resort must be had to external evidence to identify, if possible, the correct party to the guarantee."
However, the evidence regarding OAO's and ZAO's addresses was more complex than the judge indicated. OAO's registry entry is contained in the papers only in the original Russian. Neverthless the court was informed by Miss Julia Dias, counsel for OAO, that the relevant entry at paragraph 1.5 stated that whereas its postal address was at 19 Karl Marx Street, 236040, Kaliningrad, its juridical (and first stated) address was at 5A Ulitsa D Donskogo, 236000, Kaliningrad. Since there were Russian speakers in court representing Dumford who did not disagree with this translation, I feel entitled to accept what Miss Dias told us even if it is not strictly in evidence in the form of a translation. In any event, I can read Russian sufficiently to see that (a) what Miss Dias told us about para 1.5 containing two addresses is true; (b) what she told us about OAO's postal address is true; and (c) what she told us about OAO's juridical address is confirmed by ZAO's registry entry, a translation of which is in the papers before us. Thus ZAO's entry contains information regarding its holding company or "founder", which is given as OAO and whose address is given as 5A Ulitsa D Donskogo, 236000, Kaliningrad. With the help of this translation one can see that this is the address which appears first in OAO's registry entry. The upshot of all this is that the judge was entitled to say that the address given in the contractual documents was OAO's registered address, but it would be more precise to say that it was its registered postal address rather than its registered juridical address.
Turning to ZAO's registry entry, the only address given there is an address in Moscow – 57 Leningradsky Prospect. It cannot therefore be said that 19 Karl Marx Street is its registered address. However, it is possible that in practice it used its parent's postal address as its business address.
If extrinsic evidence is to be looked to in order to help elucidate the question posed by the judge as to the true party to the guarantees, there are also the facts that the contractual documentation naming ZAO as guarantor was put together by Dumford's solicitors, Nabarro Nathanson; and that a pre-contract fax dated 16 November 2001 sent by Dumford to Shelley setting out "revised indicative terms" specified "Guarantor" as (inter alios) ZAO (not OAO).
Other extrinsic evidence is that when the amended agreement came to be made, the documents which were provided under clause 5 as conditions precedent to draw-down came forward from OAO, not from ZAO: just as the documents provided under clause 3 of the original loan agreement for the purpose of draw-down had come from OAO and not from ZAO. The judge relied on the latter, not the former: but it seems to me that the latter, coming forward after the original contract had been made, probably cannot enter into the construction of it, even as a matter of extrinsic evidence: whereas the former, since they were conditions precedent to the making of the Amended Agreement, can. The range of these documents are indeed striking, covering minutes of the board and shareholders of OAO authorising the making of the guarantee, and a certificate of its registration, as well as many others.
In these circumstances on behalf of Dumford Mr Marshall's primary submission both before the judge and (in his skeleton) on this appeal was that the reference in the contracts to ZAO instead of OAO was simply a mistake, a case of misnomer or falsa demonstratio, which could be simply corrected in the reading of the contracts as part of the obvious mutual intentions of the parties. There was no claim to rectification because it was submitted that in a case of such mere misnomer no rectification was necessary. In accordance with this submission, Dumford's only evidence expressly by way of explanation of the error was contained in Professor Lugovstov's first witness statement (at para 19) where he stated that it was due to a "typographical error". He also stated (para 20) that "Once the typographical error was noticed [OAO] and Shelley each provided [Dumford] a letter dated 6 December 2001 and 22 November 2001 respectively confirming that there was no dispute over the Guarantee issued by OAO".
The judge did not ascribe the error to one of typography. He said, speaking quite generally and not necessarily with this aspect of the evidence in mind, that "aspects of the witness evidence produced by Dumford are unsatisfactory" (at para 32 of his judgment). He did not adopt the misnomer analysis. He did not explain how the error came about. He did not state, but he could well have done, that there is no document in which the typographical error is pointed out by Dumford to the other parties. The judge did, however, cite OAO's letter of 6 December 2001 to which Professor Lugovtsov had referred above. He cited it, however, not as an acceptance of a typographical error in the contractual documents, but as a further document provided under Schedule A to the original loan agreement.
The actual text of the letter is not remarkable, viz:
"We are pleased to announce that there is no dispute under the subject documents which have been entered into as between the parties thereto."
This reflects the wording of para 7 of Schedule A. What is perhaps of considerable importance is that in the heading to the letter the following is found:

"RE: Guarantee and indemnity dated 21.11.2001, parties:
OAO Atlantrybflot (Guarantor) in favour of Dumford Trading AG (Lender) related to obligations of Shelley Marketing LLC regarding 2,100,000 USD Loan Agreement with Dumford Trading A.G."
The letter as a whole, therefore, in terms accepts that the original guarantee (in fact dated 22 November 2001) was made between Dumford and OAO. It is signed by OAO's managing director under OAO's corporate seal. That is a powerful piece of evidence in Dumford's favour, but even so it is not unique in describing OAO as "guarantor".
Much of this material would make a powerful case for rectification, but that is not claimed and thus not in issue. One of the mysteries of the case, however, remains how the Amended Agreement still refers to ZAO. If it had been a mere matter of typography which the parties had quickly discovered, the error would have been remedied at latest at the time of the Amended Agreement. It remains to be seen whether there is, or would but for the title to sue issue be, a case for summary judgment under some other doctrine.
The law relating to misnomer

Thus I come first to what was below and remained on appeal Dumford's primary submission, although not the judge's analysis, that the reference throughout the contractual documents to ZAO was a mere misnomer. The maxim falsa demonstratio non nocet cum de corpore constat has often been applied to correct a misnomer or mistaken designation: see Chitty on Contracts, 29th ed, 2004, Vol I, at para 12-075: the well-known example cited there is of the incorporation in a charterparty of a clause which referred to "this bill of lading": Adamastos Shipping Co Ltd v. Anglo-Saxon Petroleum Co Ltd [1959] AC 133. However, of particular relevance are a small number of cases in which the misnomer has been of a party, rather than of an incident of a contract. In particular Miss Dias referred to the following authorities.
In Davies v. Elsby Brothers Ltd [1961] 1 WLR 170 the plaintiff had issued a writ against "Elsby Brothers – a firm" claiming damages in negligence for injuries he had received while an employee of the defendants. A time-bar point was involved, for the accident had occurred on 20 March 1956, although that date was not stated in the writ, and the writ was issued just within the necessary three years on 18 March 1959. However, in truth at the time of the accident the firm had assigned its business to a company and become Elsby Brothers Ltd. On 17 March 1960 the writ was amended before service to strike out reference to the firm and to insert instead "Ltd", thereby naming the company. It was held that the amendment could have been permitted out of time if it were the mere correction of a misnomer, but that as two separate and different entities were involved and there was nothing in the writ itself to indicate that the limited company rather than the firm must have been intended, the amendment amounted to the addition or substitution of a party and could not be made out of time. Although this was a case about a writ, not a contract, nevertheless the test adopted by this court was a test of construction of a document. Thus Devlin LJ said (at 176/7):
"It is a general principle of English law, not merely applicable to cases of misnomer, that the intention which the framer of the document has in mind when he brings it into existence is not material. In that we differ from many Continental systems. In English law as a general principle the question is not what the writer of the document intended or meant but what a reasonable man reading the document would understand it to mean; and that, I think, is the test which ought to be applied as a general rule in cases of misnomer – which may embrace a number of other situations apart from misnomer on a writ, for example, mistake as to identity in the making of a contract…One of the factors which must operate on the mind of the recipient of a document, and which operates in this case, is whether there is or is not another entity to whom the description on the writ might refer…If the accident occurred before 1955, when the company was formed, then his employers were Elsby Brothers, a firm. If the accident occurred after that date, then his employers were Elsby Brothers Limited. No person receiving this document could know who was intended to be the defendant unless inquiries were made to ascertain the date of the accident, and possibly other relevant material."
And Pearce LJ said (at 174/5):

"The date of the accident is not specified in the writ. It was possible that the accident referred to in the writ was one which had occurred while the firm was still carrying on the business. Therefore, there being the two definite, separate entities, the firm and the company, it is not possible to say that the inclusion of the firm on the writ was a mere misnomer for the inclusion of the limited company."
In Whittam v. W J Daniel & Co Ltd [1962] 1 QB 271, on very similar facts, the decision went the other way: Davies v. Elsby Brothers was distinguished for the very reason that the firm which had preceded the incorporated company had ceased to exist in 1919, so that the claim on the writ for damages for injuries sustained in 1957 could only have referred to the company. This enabled Miss Dias to submit that the existence of only one as distinct from two possible persons was critical to the result of such cases.
In F Goldsmith (Sicklesmere) Ltd v. Baxter [1970] 1 Ch 85 the plaintiffs sold a piece of land to the defendant. The memorandum of agreement gave the name of the plaintiff company, inaccurately, as Goldsmith Coaches (Sicklesmere) Ltd. There was no such company by that name. The defendant did not wish to complete, but Stamp J made an order for specific performance against him. Looking at the surrounding circumstances, there could be only one company, which could be clearly identified, which was party to the contract, and reference to it by an inaccurate name did not turn the contract into no contract. It was "no more nor less than an inaccurate description" (at 91G).
Finally, in Nittan (UK) Ltd v. Solent Steel Fabrication Ltd trading as Sargrove Automation [1981] 1 Lloyd's Rep 633 there was again only a single entity. The defendant Solent Steel took over the assets but not the liabilities of Sargrove Electronic Controls Ltd, and began to trade in relation to a particular class of manufactured goods under the business name of Sargrove Automation. The Sargrove company became dormant. An endorsement was then added to Solent Steel's policy with its insurers to provide additional cover to take account of this new business. The endorsement stated that for these purposes "the Insured shall be deemed to include Sargrove Electronic Controls Limited" but also contained an exclusion to the standard product liability cover available to Solent Steel, to the effect that there was no cover for failure of the goods to perform their intended function. The plaintiff sued Solent Steel for such a failure and Solent Steel sought to pass the liability on to its insurers. The insurers relied on the exclusion in the endorsement. Solent Steel argued that this exclusion only applied to goods supplied by Sargrove Electronic Controls Ltd, whereas the goods in question had been supplied by Solent Steel, albeit trading as Sargrove Automation. This court held that the use of the company name in the insurance policy was a mere misnomer and that there was no need of rectification, a claim for which had failed in the court below. "On the whole of the evidence it is quite clear that the head office of Cornhill made a mistake…the more accurate description would have been "Sargrove Automation"…" (per Lord Denning MR at 637). As Brightman LJ said (at 639): "All concerned knew that this limited company was not the insured, or one of them."
It seems to me that the doctrine of misnomer is of uncertain width. It is clearly a doctrine of construction, but it is not plain to what extent it permits the reference to extrinsic evidence. Davies v. Elsby Brothers Limited would suggest that where there are two possible entities, the rule is a strict one: unless one can say from the four corners of the document that the parties must have intended to refer to one rather than the other entity, then the doctrine does not apply. If, however, there is only one possible entity, then it is possible to use extrinsic evidence to identify a misdescribed party. It is arguable that Nittan v. Solent Steel falls into this latter category. Moreover, the cases, as does common sense, suggest that a case of mere misnomer is not easily (query if ever?) concluded to be such without the mistake being explicable.
Despite the strength of the surrounding factual material in this case, nevertheless the presence of two existing entities, ZAO and OAO, and the difficulty of accepting, at any rate at this stage of the proceedings, Dumford's only explanation of the alleged error, namely a simple typographical one, lead me to the conclusion that I am not persuaded that summary judgment could safely be granted on the basis that the case was one of mere misnomer. But I am not to be taken as saying that in the ultimate analysis it is not possible that that would emerge as the correct answer.
The judge's answer: construction of the guarantee with the aid of extrinsic evidence

The use of extrinsic evidence was not Mr Marshall's primary submission, but it was the judge's approach. Mr Marshall's fall-back submission was to the effect that the evidence that the judge looked at (to which Mr Marshall would add or in place of which he would substitute the documents provided under clause 5 of the Amended Agreement) was matrix, not extrinsic, evidence which a court was entitled in any event to consider: Investors Compensation Scheme Ltd v. West Bromwich Building Society [1998] 1 WLR 896 at 912/913, Bank of Credit and Commerce International SA v. Ali [2001] UKHL/8, [2002] 1 AC 251 at para 8, Kingscroft Insurance Co Ltd v. Nissan Fire & Marine Co Ltd (No 2) [1999] LLIR 603 at 612/614.
The evidence, whether matrix or extrinsic, that the parties were content that a guarantee should be provided by OAO was indeed very strong, and all the more so in that OAO, as the group holding company, owned and was known to own substantial assets, whereas ZAO was a new and poorly capitalised company. But the evidence was not uniform. Dumford's own "indicative terms" named ZAO, Kaliningrad, as guarantor. When the Amended Agreement came to be made, it was again ZAO that was named the guarantor. When the loan agreements went into default, it was (inter alios) to ZAO, and what is more to ZAO in Moscow, but not to OAO, that Dumford's solicitors, Messrs Holman Fenwick & Willan wrote, on 7 November 2003, to declare a state of default. Above all, there remained the problem how, as a matter of construction, ZAO could mean OAO. If it was a matter of mere misnomer, that hurdle was leaped. But if it was not, or may not have been, then the use of evidence to turn ZAO into OAO looks, at any rate as a matter of realistic argument, suspiciously like using evidence to alter or substitute the identity of a party, rather than to construe its meaning. And that would seem to be the role of rectification.
The judge considered himself entitled to use what he regarded as extrinsic evidence because of the guarantee's reference to ZAO's registered address as K Marks Street, Kaliningrad, when ZAO was in fact a Moscow company. However there is a danger that extrinsic evidence is here itself being used to create an ambiguity where there was none. And, given that K Marks Street was the postal address of the group company and clearly where the group operations were conducted, the official address to which notices under the agreements were to be sent, there is also a danger that, as Miss Dias put it, the tail is being used to wag the dog. There is no ambiguity about ZAO.
Both parties referred to and relied on the recent case of Shogun Finance Ltd v. Hudson [2003] UKHL 62, [2004] 1 AC 919. If anything, however, it appears to emphasise the importance of construction of the written document even in matters of the identity of parties, and also to underline the danger of using extrinsic material in what is fundamentally the role of construction. Thus the approval by the majority of the House of Lords of the earlier case in this court of Hector v. Lyons 58 P & CR 156 (see paras 162/166) seems apposite to the argument in this case. However, to the extent that matters of fact become relevant to the identification of "ZAO" or even "ZAO with a registered address at K Marks Street, Kaliningrad", it seems to me to be dangerous to be dealing with this by way of summary disposal. The analysis is not made any easier by the requirements of the Statute of Frauds: see Lovesy v. Palmer [1916] 2 Ch 233, referred to in Shogun at para 158.
In truth, the boundaries of the doctrines of misnomer, of the use of matrix or extrinsic evidence to construe, and of rectification, which have been raised by this case, were barely if at all explored: not perhaps surprisingly on a Part 24 application.
Estoppel by convention

Dumford also raised a case of estoppel by convention, relying on Amalgamated Investment & Property Co Ltd (in Liquidation) v. Texas Commerce International Bank Ltd [1982] 1 QB 84. Miss Dias responded to say that that is an attempt to use estoppel as a sword rather than a shield: but I suspect that the answer to that may well be found in what Brandon LJ said in Amalgamated Investment itself at 131/132. Even so, I do not think that this essentially factual issue can be dealt with summarily.
Conclusion

In conclusion, I would allow this appeal and quash paragraph 1 of the judge's order whereby he gave judgment for Dumford under Part 24, and also paragraphs 4/7 whereby he made consequential costs orders in favour of Dumford. He also dismissed OAO's jurisdictional challenge under Part 11 (para 2 of his order) and its own Part 24 application (para 3 of his order). There has been no challenge to the latter order in para 3, which must therefore stand. There has, however, been an appeal from para 2, but no argument as to the effect on OAO's jurisdictional challenge of a reversal of the judge's grant of summary judgment against it. It may be necessary to hear further argument about the terms of this court's order in this respect: but one solution would be to remit the matter to the commercial court.
Lord Justice Jonathan Parker:

I agree.
Lord Justice Brooke:

I also agree.
Order: Appeal allowed. Directions as set out at paragraph 40 of the Judgment. Costs below and of appeal, including costs before Lord Justice Clarke reserved. Permission to appeal to the House of Lords refused. Application for a conditional order re requirements of practice direction not satisfied refused. Money paid by way of security for costs to stay in court pending application for part 24 judgment on basis that claimant undertakes to pursue that timeously. The judge hearing that application can determine whether set off is appropriate. The two actions – should be listed together. Any challenge to the jurisdiction should be pursued before the Commercial Court judge. Costs of today to be part of costs of appeal.

LADY JUSTICE ARDEN: The time is now 2.45 pm. This appeal was listed for 2.00 pm. The matter was due to be heard in London, but it was noted that in November Mr Bates had written to the court explaining that he had difficulties in that due to ill health he was confined to a wheelchair, and also because he had not been able to obtain pro bono representation from the Citizens Advice Bureau in the Royal Courts of Justice.
When that was appreciated at the end of last week, the Civil Appeals Office took steps to arrange this video conference at 2.00 pm today. The respondents agreed that they too would attend at Middlesborough County Court in order that the hearing could take place by video conference. The court is most grateful to the officers at the Middlesborough County Court for making that facility available.
This hearing was fixed for the convenience of Mr Bates. It was my understanding that the Civil Appeals Office spoke to Mr Bates personally at the end of last week to make sure this arrangement was convenient to him. At 12.18 pm on 24 January 2005 Mr Bates sent an e-mail to the Civil Appeals Office asking for an adjournment of the hearings because he had not been able to contact the person at the Citizens' Advice Bureau who was dealing with this case. He did not know the name of his legal representative and needed to speak to him. He also said he needed an adjournment because he had not been able to obtain detailed plans of dimensions. I will expand on that point later in this judgment. Mr Bates also apologised for requesting more time. He said that he needed more help and a legal representative in court with him. The hearings was fixed for 2 o'clock.
The court officers at the Middlesborough County Court and in the Royal Courts of Justice have sought to contact Mr Bates but to no avail. Mr Bates has not arrived at the court offices to apply for the adjournment in person and to support his e-mail. Mr Bates is not entitled as of right to legal representation. He contacted the Citizens Advice Bureau, who arrange pro bono representation if possible. Clearly they have not been able to do so in this case. Mr Bates knew that back in November 2004.
So far as the filed plan is concerned, at the end of the hearing before Jonathan Parker LJ on 26 November 2004 when he gave permission to appeal, he said that an agreed scale plan would be helpful, but there was certainly no direction to that effect. Mr Bates has had plenty of time to obtain a scale plan if one was required. An appeal is not a rehearing of all the evidence and new evidence is only admitted in exceptional circumstances. Mr Bates' case is that the plan attached to the transfer to Mrs Cooks' predecessor was falsified, but that matter was not pursued at trial and forms no part of the judgment of the learned recorder.
In those circumstances, while, as Jonathan Parker LJ said it would have been helpful to have an agreed scale plan, I cannot see that that plan was an essential for today's purposes.
Mr Bates has not attended today. It may be that he did not attend in the hope that the court would simply adjourn the matter so that he would have the benefit of more time. This court must also take into account that there have been previous delays in this litigation. Mr Bates was debarred from defending the action because of his failure to file a defence. That bar was lifted and he filed a defence, although it was in very basic terms. When it came to asking for permission to appeal, he applied 67 days late. There was an adjournment on 8 November 2004 when he did not attend at the time and place fixed. I do not know why he did not attend on that occasion. He came before Jonathan Parker LJ on 26 November 2004 when Jonathan Parker LJ referred to the fact of the delay but said that he would give permission in exceptional circumstances.
There has been plenty of time for Mr Bates to prepare his case. After Christmas he served his appellant's bundle on the respondents. They saw for the first time that he was proposing to rely on two statements, one from Mr Horseman and one from Mr Hall. They then approached those witnesses themselves and obtained statements which show that those witnesses did not accept the statements put in on their behalf as being an accurate representation of their evidence. Mr Horseman also expressed doubts as to whether the signature on the statement attributed to him was his own signature.
In preparation for this appeal, the respondents issued a notice of application to set aside the permission given by Jonathan Parker LJ and a notice to serve and adduce two further statements: the statements of Mr Horseman and Mr Hall. It is their submission that the statements produced by Mrs Bates and purporting to be from Mr Horseman and Mr Hall were at least misleading. If the matter had been effective today,they would have submitted that it is unlikely that the court would have given permission to appeal had it known those statements were not in fact the true representation of the evidence of those witnesses.
In the circumstances Mr John Constable, who appears for Miss Cook, the respondent, seeks an order that this appeal be dismissed. He points out, as must be the case, that this appeal been pending for several months. It is now 11 months since the judge handed down his judgment. It has created personal difficulties for Miss Cook as she cannot sell her property.
Taking into account all the circumstances of this appeal, of this action and of the submissions made by Mr Constable, I am satisfied that this is a case in which the court should dismiss the appeal here and now leaving it to Mr Bates to take such further steps as he thinks fit in the circumstances.
MR JUSTICE MUNBY: I agree with my Lady. Jonathan Parker LJ, when giving permission to appeal, said that the litigation had been bedevilled by delay on the part of the appellants. Moreover, he indicated that he was taking an exceptional course in granting them the necessary extension of time to pursue their appeal. Mr Bates, having elected not to attend today's hearing, seeks further to delay the proceedings by seeking an adjournment on grounds which do not, in my judgment, justify an adjournment.
Enough is enough. There has been more than enough delay in this litigation. I am satisfied that further delay will cause Miss Cook serious prejudice. For those reasons, in addition to the reasons given by my Lady, I agree that this appeal should be dismissed.
Order: Appeal dismissed. transcript to be supplied to Mr Bates at public expense. Appellant to pay the respondent's costs summarily assessed in the sum of £2,750 plus VAT (solicitors costs) and counsel's fees in the sum of £1,000 plus VAT, all to be paid within 21 days.

This is an application for permission to appeal which has unfortunately taken a drawn-out form. It is made by Mr Benjamin Pell, who sued Express Newspapers and their journalist Mr Mark Watts for defamation in an action which was finally settled, almost on the eve of trial, on terms which provided Mr Pell with a payment of £125,000 plus costs. The merits of the action (the "defamation action") have therefore never been tried. Nevertheless, he seeks to appeal against an interlocutory order, made by Eady J in the week before trial, which refused him permission to re-amend his pleadings and also declined to require the defendants to make certain further disclosures which he was then seeking. In consequence Eady J also required him to pay costs to the defendants, which have been assessed at some £34,000; and Mr Pell had to swallow his own costs in respect of those applications amounting to some £26,000. By this application Mr Pell seeks to say that the judge's interlocutory order was procured by fraud and that the merits of it should be revisited on appeal. He does this, not in order to upset the settlement and so as to permit the trial to take place, nor even for the sake of reversing the rulings under the order on their merits, for those merits were merely a skirmish in the war which ended with the settlement, but simply to say that the judge's costs order was wrong and should be reversed. Of course, in order to reverse the judge's rulings on costs, Mr Pell would have to show that the judge's decision on the merits of the applications was wrong, for he does not submit that the ruling on costs should have done other than follow the outcome of the applications.
This application is brought on the basis of new evidence. It is said that the evidence ought to have been disclosed and was dishonestly suppressed. The evidence became available to Mr Pell in significant part within a few weeks of the judge's order, by 18 July 2003. All of the essential new material relied on became available to Mr Pell by December 2003. Mr Pell submits that had this new evidence been available to the judge, he would have decided the re-amendment and disclosure applications in his favour and made costs orders on an indemnity basis in his favour.
I said above that the current application for permission to appeal has taken a drawn-out form. This is in the first place because it was not filed for some considerable time after the date of the order in question. The latter was made on 1 July 2003, but Mr Pell's appellant's notice was filed only on 30 June 2004, nearly a year out of time. Mr Pell's reasons for this delay will have to be considered below. Carnwath LJ considered that the allegations made by the application raised issues which justified investigation by the court and that it should therefore be adjourned to be heard on notice. One day was assigned for the oral hearing inter partes. The day concluded before Mr Anthony Scrivener QC, who appeared on behalf of Mr Pell, had been able to conclude his submissions in reply. He was asked to put them in writing, which he did. A little later Mr Pell's solicitors wrote to the court to inform it of a recent decision. A week later Mr Pell wrote to the court in order to submit various other authorities for our attention. The civil appeals office replied to say that, if any further submissions were intended, they should be forwarded by Mr Pell's solicitors, and a dead-line was imposed. On 25 November 2004, outside the dead-line, a new file was received containing "Appellant's second submission to the court", on this occasion settled by new counsel, and twelve further authorities. I have considered all this material.
The background to the litigation: "Benjie the Binman".

At one stage of his life, albeit Mr Pell says that is now behind him, he achieved some notoriety as the so-called "Benjie the Binman": he would rifle rubbish sacks left outside offices, including lawyers' offices, for any interesting information, which he would then sell to the newspapers. In June 1999 Mr Pell met John Mappin who raised the idea of making a film drama (not a documentary) on Mr Pell's life. Mr Mappin involved a friend of his, Iain Jones, under the false pretence to Mr Pell that Mr Jones was a film-maker. As a result, Mr Pell paid Mr Mappin's company £77,500 to further the film project. Mr Pell was videoed as research for the project. He recounted his exploits before the camera. On one tape, disclosed in the defamation action, he described a raid on Brick Court Chambers' dustbins. Christopher Clarke QC of those chambers was counsel to the Bloody Sunday inquiry chaired by Lord Saville. Mr Pell said on camera that he had obtained in this way a list of the names of British soldiers who were due to give evidence anonymously to the inquiry. That was false braggadocio. When subsequently Mr Watts of Express Newspapers came into possession of a copy of this video tape (see below), he spoke to Mr Clarke QC, who told him that no such list had ever existed. A tape of this telephone conversation was disclosed by Express Newspapers. However, Mr Watts did not believe Mr Clarke, because of what he had heard Mr Pell say on the tape.
By October 2000 Mr Pell had fallen out with Mr Mappin and Mr Jones and in April 2001 he commenced proceedings against Mr Mappin and his company in deceit for the return of the £77,500 he had paid (the "film project action"). In January 2002 witness statements were exchanged in the film project action. Ms Yvonne Ridley, a journalist who had worked for the Sunday Express, provided a statement in support of Mr Mappin; as did Mr Jones. The trial was set for 11 March 2002.
On 6 February 2002 a call was made to Mr Watts' mobile from a number registered in the name of "Kevin James" with a billing address in Finchley Road, London, which was the registered office of a company run by Kevin Cahill, a journalist who also knew Mr Mappin and Ms Ridley. Mr Cahill's full name is Kevin James Cahill. Mr Watts returned the call at 09.50 and had a conversation with Mr Cahill for over 9 minutes (the "6 February phone-call"). Later that same day, at 18.01, Mr Cahill sent an email to Mr Jeffrey Donaldson MP (the "6 February email"). It read (with its typographical errors) as follows:
"Subject: Story re Saville…
Good of you to take the call. The story is simple. The people who made the Benjie the Binman movie say that he has documents retrieved from the bins of the MoD barristers, listing the names and addresses of the soldie[rs] due to give testimony to Saville. Benjie did not give them the documents, but showed them during filming and said what they were to camera. They only way the film makers could see to get the story out was under Parliamentary privilage, hense their approch to me…I am having the film makers send you the clip by email..I have also suggested that they let me try it with Mark Watts at the Sunday Express…Mark believes that we will get the front page if the material is authentic and we will be able to run the story as 'MP to raise etc'…Mark is one of the best reporters of his generation."
This email was subsequently produced by Mr Cahill annexed to his witness statement for the defendants in the defamation action, but in redacted form. The passages in italics above were covered up. This was done on the basis that it was permissible to remove references which might lead to the disclosure of journalistic sources. The 6 February phone-call appeared in Mr Watts' telephone records, which were disclosed also in redacted form: the number to which that phone-call had been made was also covered up.
Mr Pell now submits that it is plain from the unredacted version of this email together with the fact of the lengthy 6 February phone-call that Mr Watts obtained the story about Mr Pell and his videoed claim to have a list of the Bloody Sunday soldiers from Mr Cahill, and that Mr Cahill had obtained it from Mr Mappin and Mr Jones (the "film-makers"). Mr Pell also seeks to submit that it should be inferred from these circumstances that the film-makers were trying to get the "story" out under parliamentary privilege in order to put pressure on Mr Pell in the run-up to trial in the film project action; and that they were using Mr Cahill and Mr Watts to help them do so; and indeed that Mr Watts was dishonestly conspiring with the film-makers to promote the story for collateral and malicious ends connected with Mr Mappin's defence of Mr Pell's action against him.
In his witness statement for the defamation action, Mr Watts said that in late January he had heard word circulating in the journalistic community about the availability of Mr Pell's video and its contents. He decided to investigate. He said that he began his enquiries on 6 February. That day he carried out a cuttings check. He sought to find out who had made the film. He said he spoke to a confidential source whose name he had blanked out of his notepad. He said he learned of the names of Mr Mappin and Mr Jones as being involved in the film, and he inferred that this Mr Mappin was the defendant in the film project claim. He said that on that day he spoke to Mr Cahill, whom he described as a friend: and that Mr Cahill had told him to speak to Mr Donaldson (which he said he did, but only on 15 February); and that Mr Cahill had also spoken to him about Mr Mappin and Mr Jones. On 7 February he spoke to a "confidential source" and obtained a transcript of the video tape in which Mr Pell appeared. He obtained a copy of the tape itself on 8 February. It was on that day that he subsequently spoke to Mr Clarke QC. He also spoke that day to Ms Ridley and to Mr Jones and Mr Mappin. Both the latter told him that they had not seen a list of soldiers' names; although Mr Jones told him that he believed Mr Pell.
Also on 8 February Mr Cahill sent another email to Mr Donaldson, to tell him that a 14 minute clip would be arriving the following day for Mr Watts: the words "from the USA" were also redacted from this email when disclosed. On 13 February Mr Watts began writing his article for publication in the Sunday Express on 17 February.
On Saturday, 16 February Mr Pell went to synogogue in Finchley Lane, NW4. Mr Watts prepared to "doorstep" him as he left the synogogue on the subject of the forthcoming article. Mr Pell claimed in his witness statement to have seen Mr Jones and Mr Mappin outside the synogogue. Mr Watts' telephone records showed that he had made two brief calls, of 10 and 13 seconds, at 11.29, both redacted from those records (the "11.29 calls"). The first was in fact to Mr Cahill's "Kevin James" mobile number; the second to the mobile of a Mr Steve Bell, a photographer who was assisting Mr Watts that morning. Mr Pell had been very interested in these redacted numbers, for he thought that they were to Mr Mappin and/or Mr Jones, to position them in readiness outside the synogogue, and would support his case of conspiracy. He was mistaken in that suspicion as to the recipients of those calls. The redactions were made on the basis that they might reveal confidential sources, but subsequently Mr Watts revealed that the second of them had been made to his photographer; he remained uncertain, however, as to the recipient of the first call, but also unwilling to reveal it as he was still concerned it was a confidential source. It was not, he said, connected with the Pell story for it was not one of the list of all relevant numbers he had supplied to his solicitors. He said that when he tried to investigate this case subsequently, it did not connect, not even with a diversion to voicemail. He also said that the calls had been made after he had returned to his office.
The Sunday Express articles and the defamation action

On 17 February 2002 the Sunday Express published Mr Watts' article. It was headed: "This grubby snooper found the names of Bloody Sunday Paras in a lawyer's dustbin. Now the IRA know just who they are…" The article began: "Irish terrorists are feared to have been given a top secret list of British paratroopers who killed demonstrators during the Bloody Sunday march." In the defamation action Mr Pell was to complain inter alia that he had been libelled with the suggestion that he had sold the soldiers' names to the IRA. On the following Sunday, 24 February, the Sunday Express ran another article by Mr Watts, headed: "Dustbin snooper with names of Bloody Sunday Paras is facing MI5 probe."
On 11 March 2002 Mr Pell's film project action went to trial. After a five day trial Gray J gave judgment in Mr Pell's favour on 19 March. He found that Mr Mappin was liable in deceit and awarded costs against him on an indemnity basis. Mr Mappin would subsequently say that he could not afford to pay the costs, but after he was committed to prison for 4 months if he continued to refuse to answer questions and resist disclosure he managed to pay the judgment and costs in full.
In the meantime, the defendants, Express Newspapers and Mr Watts had made an offer of amends for the articles. The effect of this was that Mr Pell had to show, if he wished to succeed in a claim, that the defendants knew or had reason to believe that their articles were false and defamatory. On 18 July 2002 Mr Pell commenced his defamation action, alleging that Mr Watts knew that the articles were false and claiming aggravated as well as standard compensatory damages. Mr Pell's case on aggravated damages was that Mr Watts knew that the articles were false in part because he knew that the film-makers were making false allegations to put pressure ("improper pressure…to discontinue the action") on Mr Pell in the run-up to trial of the film project action; and that the film-makers had accompanied Mr Watts in his door-stepping of Mr Pell outside the synogogue. Ms Ridley was also implicated in these allegations. However, Mr Pell had not as yet alleged that Mr Watts had entered into a dishonest conspiracy with the film-makers.
In February 2003 disclosure produced Mr Watts' redacted telephone records and in late April 2003 exchange of witness statements produced Mr Cahill's redacted email. In his statement, Mr Cahill explained the redaction as protecting his confidential sources.
On 5 June draft re-amended particulars of claim were served on the defendants. It was in this amendment that Mr Pell first alleged a dishonest conspiracy between Mr Watts and the film-makers and their mutual friends, such as Ms Ridley. He did so in order to seek to establish a basis for a new claim for exemplary damages. But he also had other new allegations for the same purpose. By this time trial, which had been fixed for 7 July, was imminent.
On 13 June the defendants made a Part 36 offer to settle the action for £125,000 plus costs to be assessed. Mr Pell would say that his draft amendment played a part in eliciting this offer. The defendants on the other hand acknowledge that their weakness was the alleged implication that Mr Pell had sold names to the IRA.
The applications to amend and for disclosure of the redacted material

On 20 June 2003 Mr Pell made his applications to re-amend his particulars of claim and for disclosure of the redacted material. There were two days of submissions at the end of June and on 1 July Eady J gave his judgment dismissing the applications with costs. For the purpose of the hearing Mr Watts made a further, short statement. It was there that he said that for the purpose of preparing his first statement he had rung the two numbers to which he had made the 11.29 calls. He said he was not diverted to voicemail on the first one and thus did not learn the identity of the person he had called. The second number produced Mr Bell, whose identity for the purpose of that call had already been disclosed back in March.
Mr Pell, in his evidence for the applications, stated his belief that the first call was made to Mr Jones or Mr Mappin. He was seeking to make good his draft amendment alleging a dishonest conspiracy between Mr Watts and the film-makers.
A lengthy witness statement was made by Ms Helen Stanwell-Smith of the defendants' solicitors. In it she said that Mr Watts had confirmed to her that the number called on the first 11.29 call was not one on which he had ever called Mr Jones or anyone connected with him. As for redactions made to protect confidential sources, Miss Stanwell-Smith had a delicate path to tread and she trod it delicately. It was plain from Mr Watts' main witness statement that he had been in touch with Mr Cahill (and on 6 February at that) and with the film-makers. But he also spoke ambiguously of confidential sources and declined to say who had furnished him with the tape and its transcript. Miss Stanwell-Smith now said:
"10. In his statement, Mr Jennings [Mr Pell's solicitor] distinguishes between sources on the one hand and Mr Mappin and Mr Jones on the other. I am not at liberty to tell the court whether or not either Mr Mappin or Mr Jones is a confidential source of Mr Watts, but Mr Jennings must not assume that either Mr Mappin or Mr Jones is not a confidential source.
11. The amendments sought by the claimant…include a claim for exemplary damages on the basis of (amongst other matters) the fact that Mr Watts refuses to reveal his confidential sources, although the claimant states that the source of the Bloody Sunday tape must have been Mr Jones. I am not at liberty to comment one way or another in relation to whether the claimant is wrong in this assumption, but the claimant must not assume that Mr Jones is or is not a confidential source."
The judge considered first whether he would admit the draft amendment, which he characterised, no doubt accurately, and with the full benefit of those two days of argument, as an amendment to plead a claim for exemplary damages. He considered that application with care and in detail, over a judgment of 50 paragraphs. He accepted that the plea was "a very serious and a lengthy one" and also that it gave rise to "interesting and difficult questions of law". He pointed out, however, that, an offer of amends having been rejected, the issue was whether Mr Watts knew or had reason to believe that the relevant defamatory allegations were false: and that since the defamatory meaning alleged was a very serious one, he could not see in the abstract why compensatory damages should be, as Mr Pell asserted, inadequate. The judge was sceptical as to why the claim for exemplary damages could not have been pleaded before, since the earlier pleadings had already introduced an allegation of bad faith. He accepted the submission that Express Newspapers' vicarious liability for any dishonesty on the part of Mr Watts was a House of Lords point, and that it was not necessary or proportionate, on the eve of trial, to "saddle the parties with a visit to the House of Lords" when the claim for aggravated damages would suffice. He was quite satisfied that justice could be done between the parties without the need to introduce this last-minute and difficult claim, merely in the hope of adding "a bit on top". Those reasons went much broader and also much more to the judge's overall discretion in the management of the case than the submissions which this court has heard on the current application would acknowledge.
Having rejected leave to amend the particulars of claim (and there was no subsidiary submission that the allegation of a conspiracy with the film-makers to apply improper pressure on Mr Pell in his conduct of his film project action should be allowed even if the plea of exemplary damages should not), the judge dealt with the application for further disclosure very briefly. He said –
"I am satisfied that there are no circumstances which would justify me in going behind the latest assurances which have been given through Mr Shaw and Miss Stanwell-Smith. It seems to me that I cannot proceed on the basis that they have not conscientiously applied the appropriate principles."
I remark that among those principles is the statutory privilege under section 10 of the Contempt of Court Act 1981:
"No person may require a person to disclose, nor is any person guilty of contempt of court for refusing to disclose the source of information contained in a publication for which he is responsible unless it be established to the satisfaction of the court that disclosure is necessary in the interests of justice or national security or for the prevention of disorder or crime."
See also Goodwin v. United Kingdom (1996) 22 EHRR 123 (at para 39) and Ashworth Hospital Authority v. MGN Ltd [2002] 1 WLR 2033 (at para 38).

These are the judgments and orders of Eady J from which Mr Pell now seeks permission to appeal.
On 3 July 2003 Mr Pell accepted the defendants' Part 36 offer and the defamation action was at an end. He points out that in the defendants' bill of costs relating to the costs order of 1 July the following passage appears:
"The application was of critical importance. The defendants believe that the claimant's failure on this application lead to the acceptance of the payment into court (ending the dispute)."
Mr Pell himself believes that if he had succeeded in, instead of lost, these applications, he would have received a higher offer.
The new evidence

Mr Pell makes his current application on the basis of what he describes as new evidence, to the following effect. On 2 July 2003, the day after Eady J's judgments and the day before acceptance of the Part 36 offer, Mr Pell contacted No Hiding Place Ltd and the Telecommunications Investigation Unit ("TIC") to investigate details of the 11.29 calls. On the same day he was told orally, and this was confirmed in writing on 3 July, that the second call was made in the vicinity of Brent Street, NW4, ie from the area of Mr Pell's synogogue, and not from SE1, where Mr Watts' offices were. This showed that Mr Watts had made his 11.29 calls while he was still outside the synogogue. Mr Pell knew this before he accepted the Part 36 offer.
On 7 July 2003 Mr Pell asked Mr Donaldson for unredacted copies of Cahill's emails to him of 6 and 8 February 2002. Mr Pell obtained them on 18 July, ie within 17 days of Eady J's judgments. Mr Pell then knew that these emails referred to the film-makers. He had known since service of Mr Watts' main witness statement that Mr Watts had spoken to Mr Cahill on 6 February, inter alia about Mr Donaldson (see para 9 above); and that it was on that day that Mr Watts began his investigation. It might be said therefore that the unredacted email of 6 July 2002 was the important new information so far as this application is concerned. It is in dispute, however, how new or important this information was.
That Mr Pell regarded the unredacted email as being significant is confirmed by the fact that a few days after receiving it, on 24 July, Mr Pell's solicitor contacted the police "to discuss the possibility of a criminal investigation into these matters" (Mr Jennings' witness statement at para 55.6). There were meetings with the police on 14 November and 3 December. The police said they could do nothing without further evidence. In particular, they said it would be useful for Mr Pell to establish to whom Mr Watts made the first of his 11.29 calls. This was presumably because it remained Mr Pell's case in talking to the police that the call outside the synogogue was to Mr Jones or to Mr Mappin.
Mr Pell went back to No Hiding Place for that information. Within at most a matter of days, on 10 December, he was told, orally, what the number was, and to whom it was registered; and that the same number had been called in the 9 minute call on 6 February 2002; and that the number routinely diverts to voicemail, if it is not answered.
Mr Pell then had essentially all the new information on which he presents this application. The information from No Hiding Place is forensically presented as of great importance. It must in truth have come to Mr Pell as something of a disappointment. He had been expecting that it would produce a number belonging to the film-makers. In the event it produced Mr Cahill's number. Mr Pell submits that it was crucial for him to know that Mr Watts spoke to Mr Cahill for nine minutes on the morning of 6 February, the same day as the email to Mr Donaldson. But Mr Pell had long known that Mr Watts had spoken to Mr Cahill that day.
Even at this stage, in early December 2003, Mr Pell did not make this application. Why not? What this court has been told is that because of Mr Pell's limited funds he had to wait for a payment on account of costs in respect of the defamation action, of £125,000, which he received on 2 February 2004, before he was in a position financially to contemplate this application. On 6 February, instructions were sent to junior counsel (privilege is not waived); there was a conference on 19 February; a letter was sent to the defendants' solicitors on 4 March inviting them to consent to a variation of Eady J's order of 1 July 2003; a joint consultation with senior and junior counsel took place on 1 April 2004; there was further correspondence between the parties; a further consultation took place on 4 May; there was still further correspondence between the parties; and this application was filed on 30 June 2004. Mr Pell submits: "The timing of this application reflects the fact that Mr Pell has proceeded carefully and after due consideration, as is proper bearing in mind the subject matter."
Mr Pell's submissions

On behalf of Mr Pell, the following submissions have been made at one or other stage of these proceedings. Despite the settlement of the action, the costs orders made by Eady J on 1 July 2002 lie outside the settlement and can be revisited on appeal. The redactions of the telephone records and the emails have been deliberate and dishonest on the part of Mr Watts and at least reckless or grossly negligent on the part of his solicitors and in particular Ms Stanwell-Smith. Since Mr Pell does not wish to upset the settlement nor seek to relitigate the defamation action nor claim damages for Mr Watts' dishonesty, but only to reverse those costs orders, his application for permission to appeal is proportionate, and in any event his means do not permit him to proceed by the alternative method of bringing a new action based on the fraud and dishonesty which he alleges. In any event, even if there was no dishonesty and no deception of the court, and it were to be merely that inadequate disclosure was given in the matter of the redactions, that is enough to require an appeal. Part 36 offers can only proceed on the basis of proper disclosure. Public policy and the interests of justice, both in the matter of Part 36 and in defence of disclosure, as well as in policing dishonesty, make it necessary to investigate the allegations made on this application: and in any event the dishonesty and deception are manifest. As it is, the basic facts relating to the redactions have been established, after long obfuscation, and there is no longer any doubt about them, nor are they denied.
Mr Pell's submissions have gone through every permutation. It is said that Mr Cahill's redacted email of 6 February 2002 was the critical concealment, because the presence of the film-makers behind him was hidden. It is said that the 9 minute call to Mr Cahill of the same day was the critical concealment, because it emphasises the importance of Mr Cahill as the go-between that day. It is said that the first of the 11.29 calls was the critical call, because that had to be hidden since it was to the same number as the call of 6 February; and because Mr Watts must have been dishonest about not being diverted to voicemail – a lie he had to tell to explain why he did not know the owner of that number.
In the face of what is alleged to be such pervasive deception, Mr Pell through his advocates pours scorn on what is now said on behalf of the defendants: that now that the redacted number is shown to be Mr Cahill's, something previously overlooked, its redaction was probably inadvertent and in error: for Mr Cahill was never a "confidential" source. This, it is said, "transforms the whole of the [Mr Pell's] case. It changes what may have been a merely innocent non-disclosure to wilful deceit of the court". He also submits that the statutory privilege provided by section 10 of the Contempt of Court Act 1981 cannot be used for such deceitful purposes.
In the premises, Mr Pell asks for (inter alia) the following directions: permission to serve witness summonses on Orange and BT, and on Cahill and his company; an order for further evidence from the defendants, with permission for further evidence from Mr Pell; and directions for the cross-examination of Mr Watts and/or Mr Cahill.
Authorities

Of many authorities cited to emphasise, as may of course be accepted, the concern of the courts to prevent dishonesty and deliberate concealment in the litigation process from causing injustice or the danger of injustice, and in that connection to illustrate the relevance of new evidence of such dishonesty to the opening up of concluded litigation at the appeal stage, even when an appeal is prima facie out of time, the one most pressed on this court by Mr Scrivener in his oral submissions was an unreported decision of this court in Couwenbergh v. Valkova [2004] EWCA Civ 676 (27 May 2004). There permission to appeal was granted arising out of a trial relating to a disputed will. The deceased was an elderly lady. The claimant was the deceased's brother's son-in-law. The defendant was a lady who had shared the home of the deceased for many years, a close and trusted friend. In 1978 the deceased made a will leaving her estate to her brother's children and making Mr Couwenbergh her executor. In October 1990, however, a new will leaving everything to Dr Valkova was executed by the deceased and witnessed by neighbours, the Doyles. The solicitor was not happy with the engrossment and the will was executed again five days later, this time witnessed by two Italian gentlemen called Di Gregorio. That was the will admitted to probate. Mr Couwenbergh disputed that will and sought to establish the 1978 will. Letters from the Italian witnesses evidencing their role were written in 1993 and disclosed. It was accepted that the second 1990 will had been duly executed, but the deceased's testamentary capacity was in issue. The trial produced a result in favour of the second 1990 will, and costs were given against Mr Couwenbergh. An application for permission to appeal was refused. There was subsequently a police investigation into an allegation that Dr Valkova may have unlawfully contributed to the deceased's death; but the CPS decided not to prosecute. However, the police produced statements from the brothers Di Gregorio saying that neither had witnessed the second 1990 will and that the 1993 letters had not been written by them but were forged.
A renewed application for permission to appeal was then made by Mr Couwenbergh. This court held that there was a real prospect that the new evidence would satisfy the Ladd v. Marshall [1954] 1 WLR 1489 tests and would be admitted. But even if the new evidence was true, this court formed the provisional view that the first 1990 will, the Doyle will, would survive. Even so, it was arguable that there was a substantial injustice in the survival of the costs orders against Mr Couwenbergh. This court considered whether the proper way forward was by appeal or in a fresh action for fraud. It cited Sir Martin Nourse's review of recent authorities in Sohal v. Sohal [2002] EWCA Civ 1297 at paras 25 and 29 as follows:
"There is no jurisdictional bar to this court admitting the fresh evidence and dealing with the allegation by way of an appeal. But it should only do so if, in the words of Lord Woolf [in Wood v. Gahlings, unreported, 29 November 1996, at p. 3], the allegation of fraud 'can be clearly established' or if, in the words of Lord Phillips [in Hamilton v. Al Fayed, unreported, 21 December 2000] which come to the same thing) the fresh evidence or its effect is not 'hotly contested'. In any other case, the party who complains about the judgment should be left to bring a fresh action to set it aside…If this court takes the view that the fraud has not been clearly established, or that it is or certainly will be hotly contested on the evidence, then it must be open to it to say that the question will not be dealt with by way of appeal, but must be dealt with as the subject of a fresh action."
This court considered that the new Di Gregorio evidence would be hotly contested. It also considered that even if the matter proceeded by way of an appeal, the furthest that the appeal court could go in resolving the new evidence would be by ordering a new trial. So the question it posed to itself was whether there should be an appeal and (possibly) a new trial, or a fresh action and no appeal.
In those particular circumstances, this court in its discretion decided that an appeal was the preferable alternative (at para 45). It did so partly because a retrial would be likely to be less expensive, and to be completed more quickly, than a fresh action. The pleadings might suffice and "Much of the evidence stands". But the decisive factor was the outstanding order for costs:
"Thirdly, and to our minds most importantly, a rehearing gives the trial judge the greatest flexibility to do justice between these parties. As we have indicated, the real question may turn out to be what should happen with regard to the order for the costs of the first trial. On a rehearing the judge will have full power to make such order for those costs as is just. He may discharge the order altogether, or he may order Mr Couwenbergh to pay part of the costs. The trial judge in a fresh action will have no such broad discretion."
Discussion and conclusion

Although the facts relating to the redacted information in itself are now plain or may reasonably be assumed to be so, the circumstances and motivations which led to the redactions are wholly in dispute. Mr Pell submits that the redactions were dishonestly concealed, motivated by a desire to avoid the emergence of dishonest conduct in the preparation of the disputed articles for publication. The defendants reject the underlying accusation of dishonesty, and point out that Mr Pell never got his conspiracy theory onto the pleadings: there was no obligation of disclosure in connection with a very late amendment for which Mr Pell never got leave. The defendants also reject the allegation of dishonest nondisclosure.
It is impossible for this court on a permission to appeal application in the circumstances of this case to form even a provisional view as to whether there is a real possibility of Mr Pell making good his case of deliberate and dishonest concealment. The new information may be plain, but it says nothing at all about the allegations of underlying dishonesty or dishonesty in concealment. However, the redactions all appear on documents which were disclosed, and the content of those redactions can be evaluated against their background. In this context, the redacted material turns out to be exactly the sort of thing that one might have expected it would be: the surrounding circumstances always suggested that the film-makers had to be involved in one way or another in the emergence of the tape and its transcript; Mr Cahill was clearly involved from the outset (see his email to Mr Donaldson of 6 February 2002) and he, Mr Cahill, was obviously getting his information from other sources. Mr Watts was plainly in contact with Mr Cahill from at least that same day and by telephone: Mr Watts said so, although he did not identify the 9 minute call as having been the telephone call in question. In the circumstances there is nothing sinister in the 9 minute call to Mr Cahill. The film-makers, Mr Mappin and Mr Jones, were known and identified and Mr Watts was in contact with them – he said so. There is no surprise nor anything sinister in Mr Watts calling Mr Cahill outside the synogogue. Mr Pell, on the other hand, was expecting that call to have been made to one of the film-makers. Mr Pell submits that Mr Watts is lying in not recognising Mr Cahill's number as his number; lying in saying that he was not diverted to voicemail, for otherwise he would have known that number to be Mr Cahill's; and he seeks to involve Ms Stanwell-Smith in that deception because he asks why she did not check that number in the same way as Mr Bell's number was checked and revealed. On the other hand, there would be no reason for Mr Watts deliberately to conceal Mr Cahill's number; and the involvement of the defendants' legal advisers in the process of disclosure and redaction is not easily or lightly to be thought to be consistent with dishonest motives.
In these circumstances what seems to me to be of the highest significance is that the overall litigation between Mr Pell and the defendants was settled, without trial, by Mr Pell's acceptance of their Part 36 offer. The underlying allegations, pleaded or unpleaded, were never examined. There was some discussion in the course of oral submissions as to the formal effect of a Part 36 settlement. I assume for the purposes of this judgment, and in favour of Mr Pell's submissions, that the Part 36 process is not a formal contract as distinct from a matter of procedure, even if it appears to be analogous to one, and that the parties' settlement is in no way a formal bar to Mr Pell challenging the judge's order for costs. I also assume for these purposes that, pursuant to Part 36.15(5)(b), the stay imposed under Part 36.15(2)(a) will not affect the power of the court to "deal with any question of costs…relating to the proceedings". Nevertheless, what Mr Pell's argument involves is that he is seeking by way of an appeal to reopen the fundamental merits of an action that has been settled. He wishes to prove that the judge should have allowed an amendment to plead a case of dishonesty, and to have ordered further disclosure in aid of that case, on the ground that he can prove that case of dishonesty, and can further prove a collateral case of dishonesty in the process of disclosure which is itself premised on, because motivated by, that underlying dishonesty in the fundamental merits of the action.
However, what is particularly extraordinary about this case is that Mr Pell's application involves this revisiting of the entrails of a settled action not in order to set aside the settlement as having been procured by fraud, but merely to reverse an interlocutory costs order. The incongruity of this aspiration is underlined by Mr Pell's own submissions. On the one hand he seeks to emphasise the importance of the applications heard by Eady J as vitally affecting the action and its settlement: he says that if the judge had decided in his favour he would have been able to achieve a much better settlement. On the other hand, he affirms that he does not wish to challenge or set aside the settlement: he wishes to retain its fruits, and he does not seek any damages for deceit.
In my judgment, however, what Mr Pell is seeking to do is wholly disproportionate and contrary to the interests of justice. If interlocutory orders could be challenged by way of appeal on the ground of an alleged deceit, and even, as Mr Scrivener submits, in the absence of deceit and purely on the ground of error, and if this could be done even though the result of trial or of settlement was to be left undisturbed and even though the fundamentals of the dispute, or a large part of them, would have to be relitigated in the appeal process and in all probability again at a rehearing of some kind, and all for the sake of the incidence of costs under such interlocutory orders; then the importance of the finality of judgments and settlements would have been gravely undermined. The process of appeal would have been subverted.
In any event, I am unable to say that Mr Pell has persuaded me that he has shown a real prospect of success on appeal. As for the judge's decision not to allow the re-amendment to plead a case in exemplary damages, that decision, which was ultimately in the judge's discretion as a matter of his case management on the eve of trial, was taken by him on a far wider basis than Mr Pell has sought even to dispute. The allegation of a dishonest conspiracy with respect to the film project action, which assumes on this application so dominant a role, was but part of a broader canvas before Eady J. As for the judge's decision on disclosure, it largely followed on his previous decision.
Of course, if Mr Pell is right to say that the court, as well as he, have been deceived by deliberate concealment in the process of disclosure in aid of the dishonest suppression of a conspiracy to put improper pressure on Mr Pell in his film project action, then the public as well as his own interests would be involved in the vindication of the truth. It may be that those interests ought to be pursued and vindicated, even though the film project action continued to proceed, as it did, towards Mr Pell's complete victory, and even though the defamation action has been settled and Mr Pell himself has no desire to set aside that settlement. But there is a very large question-mark over whether Mr Pell is right in his allegation of serious dishonesty; and it is not as though he is without an alternative remedy. If he considers that he has been defrauded by Mr Watts and/or Express Newspapers (and it is not clear to me that any dishonesty by Mr Watts in this respect would affect Express Newspapers), then he is able to start a fresh action on the ground of such fraud. As Lord Buckmaster said in Jonesco v. Beard [1930] AC 298 at 300 –
"It has long been the settled practice of the Court that the proper method of impeaching a completed judgment on the ground of fraud is by an action in which, as in any other action based on fraud, the particulars of the fraud must be given and that allegation established by the strict proof such a charge requires. In Flower v Lloyd (1877) 6 Ch D 297, at p 302…James LJ states that "you cannot go to your adversary and say, 'You have obtained the judgment by fraud and I will have a rehearing, of the whole case' until that fraud is established"."
That statement has recently been reaffirmed by the House of Lords in Kuwait Airways Corporation v. Iraqi Airways Company and Republic of Iraq (No 2) [2001] 1 WLR 429. Even if that practice were to be regarded as less settled, so that it is a matter of discretion on the particular facts of each case whether such an allegation of fraud should proceed by way of appeal or by way of fresh action, nevertheless it is in my judgment clear that in this case Mr Pell should be required to proceed by way of fresh action and not by way of appeal. First, the alleged fraud is hotly disputed. Secondly, in a complex case the allegation has yet to be clearly and properly set out in the way in which only pleadings can clarify. Thirdly, the appeal process is an unsatisfactory basis for the analysis of an untried allegation of fraud. Fourthly, because of the settlement the underlying action never reached the exposition of a trial: and that makes the prospect of adapting the process of appeal to the review of Mr Pell's case all the harder. Fifthly, it is clearly unsatisfactory for this court to hear on appeal, merely for the sake of an interlocutory order of costs, submissions which go to the fundamentals of a settled action whose settlement itself is not to be disturbed.
In this connection Couwenbergh was quite a different case. Although the incidence of costs there drove this court's solution of the proper process, the costs concerned were the costs of fighting an action down to the end of trial where the new evidence, from the critical witnesses, was fundamentally inconsistent with the trial result. If that evidence was accepted, the trial result could not stand. That might mean that the costs orders could not stand, in whole or in part. Whereas, if Mr Couwenbergh had to go to a fresh action, the existence of the first 1990 will, the Doyle will, might well prevent Mr Couwenbergh scoring any success whatsoever. The idiosyncracies of that case in no way guide the solution of this application.
For all these reasons, I would not give permission to appeal in this case.
So far, however, I have not considered two further critical questions. Although one goes to the merits of this application and the other is a procedural matter of delay, they are interconnected and I propose to deal with them both together. One of the Ladd v. Marshall tests for the admission of new evidence is whether the evidence could with the exercise of due diligence have been made available for trial. That is the question which goes to the merits of the application. The other question is whether Mr Pell has provided a good explanation for his delay of very nearly a year in bringing this application.
It would seem that Mr Pell was always in a position to obtain the redacted material. He received the emails from Mr Donaldson within 15 days of asking. It is suggested, albeit without evidence, that Mr Donaldson was willing to provide the emails only after he heard that the defamation action had been settled. This, however, has not been established. As for the telephone information, Mr Pell always seems to have been in a position to obtain that, and to do so within days of asking. That is an additional reason for thinking that there is no real prospect of a successful appeal.
As for the year's delay, Mr Pell in essence says that he could only proceed when he had received the fruits of his action from the defendants; and that the remaining delay was caused by taking legal advice and correspondence with the defendants. I would not consider that a satisfactory explanation, however. It suggests that Mr Pell wanted to use the fruits of his settlement to raise an appeal which sought to relitigate some at least of the essential complaints of the settled action. Nor am I satisfied that Mr Pell, who also had the proceeds of his other action, and was assured of the proceeds of his settlement, was unable to proceed timeously. In any event, if there was delay caused by lack of funds, it was necessary to proceed all the faster thereafter: a fortiori in a case which is put forward as one of manifest deception.
For these reasons I do not consider that time should be extended to permit this application to be made. If, however, I had considered that there was such a case of prima facie fraud as should proceed to appeal, the question of time may well have had to be regarded differently. As it is, I have thought it right to consider the merits of the application separately from the question of time. In my judgment, this application should be refused on both grounds.
Lord Justice Chadwick:

I agree.

LORD JUSTICE LAWS: This is an appeal against an order made in contempt proceedings by His Honour Judge Coles QC on 20th May 2004 in the Worcester County Court, by which he ordered that the applicant be committed to prison for contempt for six months but that the committal be suspended until 20th November 2004 provided that during the period until that date the applicant commit (as it was put) no further breach of an injunction which restrained him from molesting his wife or interfering with her. That order had originally been made without notice on 19th April 2004 by District Judge Suckling on the basis of a sworn statement by the wife. In that statement she complained of an incident of violence in which the couple's two young children as well as the wife herself had been struck by the applicant. That was said to have taken place on 16th April 2004.
On 29th April 2004 the applicant faced committal proceedings before His Honour Judge Mott for alleged breaches of the order. His Honour Judge Mott found that the applicant had breached the order by acts which took place on 21st April 2004, partly (so the judge found) perpetrated by the applicant and partly by the applicant's brother on his behalf. The judge said:
"10. I have had to consider of course the credibility of the witnesses and the various points that have been made on both sides. Clearly somebody is lying and there has been a great deal of hard swearing going on. In the end I have come to the conclusion without any doubt at all that I believe the evidence given by Mrs Vanessa Champken and her mother and I reject that given by the husband and by his brother."
Judge Mott sentenced the applicant to four months in prison but the sentence was suspended until 19th November 2004. He also issued revised injunctions again the applicant, but they I think were also limited in time. In fact the applicant and his wife are now back together with their children and the orders below are all spent. But the applicant is anxious to have Judge Coles' decision overturned if that is justified.
On 20th May 2004 the applicant faced applications by his wife calling upon him to show cause why he should not be committed for breaches of the orders made on 19th and 29th April. In his judgment given on the same day Judge Coles said that with the assistance of counsel he had drawn up a schedule of allegations against the applicant, amounting in all to some 14 incidents as he enumerated them. As he said:
"5. ... The allegations are that on some occasions the respondent was in breach of the injunctions against him by directly going to the former matrimonial home at 259 Drake Avenue, Dines Green in Worcester, or, alternatively, by encouraging others to go there and either use violence upon her or to threaten her or harass her."
Again the applicant and his wife both gave evidence. It was part of the applicant's case that he had been at a bail hostel when some of the breaches were said to have been committed. It was part of the wife's case that in some instances other persons acting on behalf of the applicant did the acts in question. The judge commented, plainly rightly, that the fundamental question was whether he believed the wife or the applicant. He correctly directed himself that the criminal standard of proof applied. Then he dealt in general terms with the crucial issue of credibility as follows:
"8. In assessing the credibility of the witnesses I should say that I found the applicant wife, Mrs Champken, to be a truthful witness. I did not form a very high opinion of the credibility of the respondent, but that of course is not an end of the matter because there are other matters which go to credibility and I should say that I accept the observations made by Mr Halstead for the respondent that the evidence of the log kept by the probation service at the bail hostel is evidence to be taken into consideration but, on the other hand, I do not think that evidence is conclusive on all matters because it does not necessarily prove that Mr Champken was not at a particular place at a particular time although there are instances when clearly it does prove that. I have had some assistance from the bail hostel on the logs but I do not think it is necessarily conclusive.
9. I have come to the further conclusion that I accept the submissions by Mr Bagshaw that there is an overwhelming inference from particular matters which I will identify that where incidents occurred and third parties were involved, the actions of those third parties were either encouraged or solicited by the intervention of Mr Champken. I have reached this conclusion because I think there is absolutely no other explanation as to why anybody else would have done what I accept she says has been done (which I will come to in a moment). The only inference to draw, and I think it is an absolutely overwhelming inference, is that what these other third persons did was at the instigation or encouragement of or solicitation of the respondent."
It will be seen at once that the judge's overwhelming inference that the relevant actions of other persons were done on behalf of the applicant only arose for consideration once the judge accepted, as he did, that those actions had in fact been carried out by someone. The judge proceeded to go through the list of 14 incidents. At length he stated that the breaches said to have been constituted by incidents numbers 2, 3, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 11 and 12 were all proved, but not those numbered 13 and 14.
The applicant now appeals in effect against the adverse findings in this judgment. His essential case is that the judge's favourable view of his wife's credibility and his consequent conclusions in relation to most of the allegations are unsustainable or (in the language of the criminal law) unsafe. I will return briefly to the test to be applied by this court in an appeal of this kind.
The applicant has a major point relating to certain events which happened after 20th May 2004 when the judge gave judgment. This point would require the introduction of fresh evidence. We indicated in the course of argument that we would admit it. I will explain the point shortly, but there are some other points taken relating to material which was before the judge and considered by him. I will deal with those first. They can be addressed quite briefly.
It is first said that the judge should have paid attention to the fact that there were inconsistencies between a witness statement by the wife and her diary entry for 30th April 2004 and a police statement. The witness statement contained an allegation not found in the other documents. This relates to incident number 3. It is clear from paragraph 12 of the judgment (which I will not read) that the judge had this point in mind. Nevertheless he concluded as he did.
I would reject this ground of appeal. This court will not interfere with a factual finding in contempt proceedings, as in other proceedings, unless satisfied that it is wrong (see Abouchitaa v El­Yamlahi [2001] EWCA Civ 1407). The judge heard the witnesses. He considered the point in question as I have said. He was entitled to conclude as he did. There is no basis here for upsetting his judgment.
The next point relates to incident number 4, by which it was alleged that someone knocked on the wife's door, grabbed her round the throat and said "this is for John", meaning the applicant. The applicant had in fact been in custody since about 2.00 pm the day before. The judge accepted the wife's evidence that the incident had happened but acquitted the applicant of any involvement, saying (paragraph 13) that there was insufficient evidence that it had been done at the applicant's instigation. The applicant said that the judge should have positively found that he was not involved.
I have some difficulty in seeing how the applicant is entitled to appeal against a decision in his favour simply because he complains of the judge's reasoning. But in any event there is nothing in this. Always subject to the applicant's major point on the fresh evidence to which I am coming, there is nothing here to upset the judge's finding.
I should say there is also a complaint concerning the judge's findings on incidents 13 and 14, where again he found no breach. Mr Halstead for the applicant says he should have made specific findings in relation to those matters which would have affected his view of the wife's credibility on other matters. He might indeed have done so; but this is again an insufficient basis on which to overturn Judge Coles' conclusions.
The next point concerns incidents 9 to 12 which the judge took together. I must read paragraphs 17 and 18 of the judgment:
"17. Number 9 is on 7th May and I can group together numbers 9, 10, 11 and 12. They are all allegations on 7th, 8th and 11th May of either writing on the back door or the back window or the delivery of a threatening letter to the front door and pebbles being thrown at the house. I find that the respondent himself actually either did this writing or wrote these letters or it was at the respondent's instigation. A point is made about the letter which was delivered at 8.30 pm on 11th May. I will read the letter: 'I told you I will not go down. I will make out you are lying. I have people who will say I was with them. I will get you. I will be in town ---' and the rest is indecipherable. It does go on but I won't read the rest of it.
18. The point is made that the work 'lying' is spelt 'L.I.Y.I.N.G.' Mrs Champken was asked in the witness box how she spelt the word 'lying' and she said, 'I spell lying L.I.Y.I.N.G.' It was said that that was very strong evidence that she actually fabricated that by writing 'lying' in that way. I have been troubled by that, but when the respondent gave evidence he indicated in the witness box that he was a very bad speller, contrary to what in fact his wife had said. And when I asked him to spell 'lying' he spelt it L.I.I.N.G. Given that they both would appear to be bad spellers, I don't think I can attach the sort of weight which Mr Halstead wants me to attach to that bad spelling to reach the conclusion that the case has not been proved. So I find that all those matters, that is to say 9, 10, 11 and 12, are proved."
This is in my judgment a much more substantial point. The fact that the wife misspelt the word 'lying', L-I-Y-N-I-N-G, in exactly the same way as it had been misspelt in the letter complained of, is to say the least striking. Further the judge is with respect surely guilty of a non sequitur. The fact that the applicant is a bad speller as well does not mean that the point about the wife's spelling is any less forceful. I would have been inclined at least to find that this particular allegation was unproved given the point about the spelling. However, I repeat the judge heard and assessed the witnesses and for my part I would not be prepared to hold that this point, striking though it is, alone infects the whole of the wife's case put forward on 20th May.
Now I may turn to the major point on the fresh evidence which (if I may so put the matter) is really what the case is about. On 21st May 2004, the very day after the hearing before Judge Coles, the wife complained to the police and made a statement to the effect that that morning, 21st May, a man assaulted her in her garden, grabbing her and putting his right arm around her neck and his left hand in her lower back. She said she felt something sharp in his left hand. She claimed that this man had said:
"John said you don't think he's going to leave you alone just because he got off yesterday."
Then, according to the wife, the man ran away. However, the same night she made a further statement to the police admitting that this allegation about the intruder was entirely false. We do not have this statement. It is however referred to in a case summary prepared by the police which records that at 11.30 pm on 21st May the wife was charged (with an offence of attempting to pervert the course of justice) and was bailed to appear at the Worcester Magistrates' Court on 27th May.

A supplemental skeleton argument put in on the wife's behalf states that she appeared at the Worcester Crown Court in August 2004 and pleaded guilty, and on 12th December 2004 she was sentenced to a community rehabilitation order of 18 months' duration. This skeleton argument is also the source of our information that the applicant and the wife are reconciled.
Mr Bagshaw for the wife submits that the test on appeal for a committal order is whether the decision below was wrong (CPR 52.11(3)). I have already indicated that that is indeed the test. However in my judgment, given the particular context and the quasi-criminal nature of committal proceedings, if the decision at first instance is demonstrated to this court's satisfaction to be unsafe because it is based on tainted evidence, then it may readily be categorised as wrong. Otherwise the court is powerless to remedy the injustice that would arise when a person has been committed to prison on evidence which in truth ought now to be regarded as unreliable.
The events which happened on 21st May 2004 and thereafter persuade me that the decision of Judge Coles is unsafe. The false allegation of 21st May is in fact extremely similar to some of the allegations relied on and found to be proved by Judge Coles. Of course I accept that not every later lie by a complainant in the wife's position will necessary undermine an earlier finding of a judge who had believed her evidence. My view of the matter is entirely generated by the particular facts here: the striking similarity of the false allegation and the earlier allegations and the fact (which I also regard as relevant) that this false tale was made up one day after Judge Coles had decided as he decided.
In those unusual circumstances -- and they are unusual -- I for my part would allow this appeal and quash the order made by Judge Coles.
It is canvassed in I think the skeleton argument put in by Mr Halstead for the wife whether Judge Mott's decision also ought to go. We have not heard argument about that. Subject to my Lord's view of course, if he agrees with my view as to the decision of Judge Coles, we had better hear very brief submissions about Judge Mott.
LORD JUSTICE WALL: I agree.
(Further submissions)
LORD JUSTICE LAWS: Having heard brief submissions about Judge Mott's order, given the conclusions that were reached by my Lord and myself in relation to Judge Coles, I would also quash Judge Mott's order. It is not I think necessary to add any additional reasoning.
LORD JUSTICE WALL: I agree.
ORDER: Appeals allowed.

Skepticism over the paper
The researchers, although amazed by the capabilities of the machine-learning model, are skeptical as well. They write in their paper, “We acknowledge that this approach is somewhat subjective and informal, and that it may not satisfy the rigorous standards of scientific evaluation.”

The same is echoed by Maarten Sap, a researcher and professor at Carnegie Mellon University, who came down heavily on the paper, saying, “The ‘Sparks of A.G.I.’ is an example of some of these big companies co-opting the research paper format into P.R. pitches. They literally acknowledge in their paper’s introduction that their approach is subjective and informal and may not satisfy the rigorous standards of scientific evaluation.”

